Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.270

Nursery dealer licensing exemptions—Permits for clubs, conservation districts, nonprofit associations, educational organizations. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to nursery dealer licensing do not apply to: (a) Persons making casual or isolated sales that do not exceed one hundred dollars annually; (b) any garden club, conservation district, or charitable nonprofit association conducting not more than three sales per year for not more than four consecutive days each of horticultural plants which are grown by or donated to its members; (c) educational organizations associated with private or public secondary schools; and (d) the production of cannabis and persons who are licensed as cannabis producers under RCW 69.50.325 with respect to the operations under such license. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "cannabis" and "cannabis producer" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 69.50.101. However, such a club, conservation district, association, or organization must apply to the director for a permit to conduct such sales.

(2) All horticultural plants sold under such a permit must be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2022 c 16 s 10; 2014 c 140 s 32; (2014 c 140 s 31 expired July 1, 2020); 2007 c 335 s 4; 2000 c 144 s 5; 1993 c 120 s 3; 1990 c 261 s 3; 1985 c 36 s 3; 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 3.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2022 c 16 s 10: "Section 10 of this act expires July 1, 2030." [ 2022 c 16 s 175.]

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Effective date—2014 c 140 s 32: "Section 32 of this act takes effect July 1, 2020." [ 2014 c 140 s 42.]

Expiration date—2014 c 140 s 31: "Section 31 of this act expires July 1, 2020." [ 2014 c 140 s 41.]

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.270

Licensing exemptions—Permits for clubs, conservation districts, nonprofit associations, educational organizations. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to licensing do not apply to: (a) Persons making casual or isolated sales that do not exceed one hundred dollars annually; (b) any garden club, conservation district, or charitable nonprofit association conducting not more than three sales per year for not more than four consecutive days each of horticultural plants which are grown by or donated to its members; (c) educational organizations associated with private or public secondary schools; and (d) the production of cannabis and persons who are licensed as cannabis producers under RCW 69.50.325 with respect to the operations under such license. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "cannabis" and "cannabis producer" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 69.50.101. However, such a club, conservation district, association, or organization must apply to the director for a permit to conduct such sales.

(2) All horticultural plants sold under such a permit must be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2022 c 16 s 11; 2014 c 140 s 32; 2000 c 144 s 5; 1993 c 120 s 3; 1990 c 261 s 3; 1985 c 36 s 3; 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 16 s 11: "Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1, 2030." [ 2022 c 16 s 176.]

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Effective date—2014 c 140 s 32: "Section 32 of this act takes effect July 1, 2020." [ 2014 c 140 s 42.]